Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3207
Bank or trust company; common trust funds authorized; investments; conditions.

Any bank or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state may establish common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary, or to itself and others, as cofiduciaries, and may, as such fiduciary or cofiduciary, invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in such common trust funds, if such investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating such fiduciary relationship and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its cofiduciaries to such investment.

Laws 1953, c. 67, § 1, p. 212;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-601.01.